Nevada, session 83, SB52.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.4073 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388.4073 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall
determine the number and percentage of pupils enrolled in schools
within the school district who are:
(a) Immigrants;
(b) Refugees;
(c) Newcomers to the English language and short-term and
long-term English learners; and
(d) English learners, in total and disaggregated by English
learners who:
(1) Are pupils with an individualized education program or a
plan developed in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation
Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794;
(2) Are enrolled, placed or participating in:
(I) A special program, including, without limitation, a
special program for gifted and talented pupils;
(II) A program for career and technical education;
(III) A magnet school or program;
(IV) An advanced placement course;
(V) An international baccalaureate course;
(VI) A dual credit course; or
(VII) An extracurricular or athletic activity, if known;
(3) Receive a high school diploma, disaggregated by type of
diploma; and
(4) Attend an institution of higher education after receiving a
high school diploma and, if known, receive a scholarship to attend
an institution of higher education.
2. The data collected pursuant to subsection 1 must be
disaggregated by grade and pupils who are English learners.
3. The board of trustees of each school district shall determine
the number of teachers:
(a) Employed by the school district who have an endorsement to
teach pupils in a program of bilingual education or who have an
endorsement to teach English as a second language; and
(b) Who are trained in a program for language instruction
adopted by the board of trustees of the school district, to the extent
practicable.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
 The data collected pursuant to this subsection must be
disaggregated by teachers who are licensed to teach elementary
education, middle school or junior high school education or
secondary education.
4. On or before August 1 of each year, the board of trustees of
a school district shall review the data collected pursuant to
subsections 1 and 3, compile a report of the data and submit the
report to the Department. The Department may make
recommendations to the board of trustees of each school district to
improve programs for English learners based on the reports it
receives pursuant to this subsection.
5. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall
submit the reports it receives pursuant to subsection 4 to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature, or if the Legislature is not in session, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education.
6. As used in this section, “long-term English learner” means a
pupil who [is] has been classified as an English learner [who has
lived in the United States] for [at least] more than 6 consecutive
years [.] after the pupil was first identified as an English learner.
Sec. 2. NRS 392.785 is hereby amended to read as follows:
392.785 1. The superintendent of schools of a school district
or the governing body of a charter school, as applicable, may
authorize the promotion of a pupil to grade 4 who would otherwise
be retained in grade 3 only if the superintendent or governing body,
as applicable, approves a good-cause exemption for the pupil upon a
determination by the principal of the school pursuant to subsection 3
that the pupil is eligible for such an exemption.
2. A good-cause exemption must be approved for a pupil who
previously was retained in grade 3. Any other pupil is eligible for a
good-cause exemption if the pupil:
(a) Demonstrates an acceptable level of proficiency in reading
on an alternative standardized reading assessment approved by the
State Board;
(b) Demonstrates, through a portfolio of the pupil’s work,
proficiency in reading at grade level, as evidenced by demonstration
of mastery of the academic standards in reading [beyond] for
grade 3;
(c) Is an English learner and has received not less than 2 years of
instruction in a program of instruction that teaches English as a
second language;
(d) Received intensive remediation in the subject area of reading
for 2 or more years but still demonstrates a deficiency in reading
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
and was previously retained in kindergarten or grade 1 or 2 for a
total of 2 years;
(e) Is a pupil with a disability and his or her individualized
education program indicates that the pupil’s participation in the
uniform examination administered pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 5 of NRS 392.780 is not appropriate; or
(f) Is a pupil with a disability and:
(1) He or she participates in the uniform examination
administered pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 5 of
NRS 392.780;
(2) His or her individualized education program or plan
developed in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act
of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, documents that the pupil has received
intensive remediation in reading for more than 2 years, but he or she
still demonstrates a deficiency in reading; and
(3) He or she was previously retained in kindergarten or
grade 1, 2 or 3.
3. The principal of a school in which a pupil who may be
retained in grade 3 pursuant to subsection 1 is enrolled shall
consider the factors set forth in subsection 2 and determine whether
the pupil is eligible for a good-cause exemption. In making the
determination, the principal must consider documentation provided
by the pupil’s teacher indicating whether the promotion of the pupil
is appropriate based upon the record of the pupil. Such
documentation must only consist of the existing plan for monitoring
the progress of the pupil, the pupil’s individualized education
program, if applicable, and the pupil’s plan developed in accordance
with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794,
if applicable. If the principal determines that promotion of the pupil
to grade 4 is appropriate, the principal must submit a written
recommendation to the superintendent of schools of the school
district or to the governing body of the charter school, as applicable.
The superintendent of schools or the governing body of the charter
school, as applicable, shall approve or deny the recommendation of
the principal and provide written notice to the principal of the
approval or denial.
4. A principal who determines that a pupil is eligible for a
good-cause exemption pursuant to subsection 3 shall notify the
parent or legal guardian of the pupil if the superintendent of schools
of the school district or the governing body of the charter school, as
applicable, has approved the good-cause exemption.
5. The principal of a school in which a pupil for whom a good-
cause exemption is approved pursuant to subsection 3 and who is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
promoted to grade 4 must ensure that the pupil continues to be
provided intervention services and intensive instruction in the
subject area of reading pursuant to NRS 392.760.
6. As used in this section, “individualized education program”
has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(A).
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 1 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Section 2 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2028.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)